Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 11 Simulcast Programs from Licensed Betting Facilities

41-11-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following words shall mean:

“Day” means the normal business day of the facility on which the licensee may conduct multiple programs.

“Licensee” means an entity licensed pursuant to chapters 3.1 and 7 of this title.

“Simulcast” means the live television broadcast of programs, either interstate or intrastate, to a licensee of a licensed facility within the state. The program must be sanctioned and/or licensed in the state of origin.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 61, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 16, § 1.

41-11-2.
Simulcast.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

41-4-2

as to location of programs only, a licensee may enter into a contract with any licensed racing association to simulcast programs from the facility on certain racing days.

A licensee may simulcast programs for all or a portion of the days and times that video lottery games are offered at the licensee’s facility.

A licensee shall obtain a permit from the division of gaming and athletics licensing.

A licensee may accept pari-mutuel wagering on the simulcast at the licensed facility and not at any other location.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general law, public law, or local ordinance to the contrary, including without limitation the provisions contained in §§

5-23-2(d)

,

25-3-2

and

25-3-3

, a licensee, other than an entity licensed pursuant to §

41-7-3(a)

and (c), shall not be required to provide employees time and a half pay for the work performed during Sundays and holidays.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 61, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 8.

41-11-3.
Taxes and commissions.

Each licensee conducting wagering in a simulcast betting facility under the pari-mutuel system shall pay to the state, and there is hereby imposed, a tax on such programs at the rate of:

Four percent (4%) of the total money wagered thereon on win, place, and show wagers;

Four percent (4%) on multiple wagers therein involving two (2) animals; and

Five and one-half percent (5.5%) on exotic wagers therein involving three (3) or more animals.

Where the division has approved the integration of wagers placed at the simulcast facility into similar wagering pools at a host facility where the program is conducted, each licensee conducting wagering in a simulcast betting facility may retain as his or her commission an amount equal to the takeout at the host facility of which one and four-tenths percent (1.4%) shall be paid to the kennel owners at facilities licensed pursuant to chapter 3.1 of this title. This tax structure shall apply to any transmission of programs between licensed facilities within the state. Where integration of wagers does not occur the division shall be:

Twenty percent (20%) of the amounts wagered on win, place, and show wagers, of which one and four-tenths percent (1.4%) shall be paid to the kennel owners at facilities licensed pursuant to chapter 3.1 of this title.

Twenty percent (20%) of the amounts wagered on multiple wagers involving two (2) animals, of which one and four-tenths percent (1.4%) shall be paid to the kennel owners at facilities licensed pursuant to chapter 3.1 of this title.

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the amounts wagered on exotic wagers involving three (3) or more animals, of which one and four-tenths percent (1.4%) shall be paid to the kennel owners at facilities licensed pursuant to chapter 3.1 of this title.

One-half (1/2) of the breakage to the dime resulting from the betting shall be deposited as general revenues. The remaining breakage shall be retained by the licensee.

The amount of unclaimed money that shall hereafter be held by any licensee, on account of outstanding and uncashed winning tickets, shall, at the expiration of one year after the close of the meeting during which the tickets were issued, be paid into the general fund of the state.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, money wagered on the simulcast of intrastate and interstate programs, as provided in this chapter, shall be subject only to the tax imposed in this section, and provided further, where there is interstate transmission of signals in accordance with national practice, the tax shall be levied in the receiving state only.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 61, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1995, 370, art. 40, § 126; P.L. 1996, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 152.

41-11-4.
Admission of minors prohibited.

No person who is under the age of eighteen (18) years shall be admitted into a building where pari-mutuel betting or simulcast is taking place, unless the person is an employee of a licensed concessionaire or licensed vendor and performing his or her duties of employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 16, § 3.